es: Estilo numérico: Números arábigos; Números decorativos; Dígitos digitales; Lunares; Marcadores de índice; Línea; Números mixtos; Sin números; Números romanos; Otros
hr-HR: Stil brojeva: Arapski brojevi; Dekorativni brojevi; Digitalne znamenke; Točkice; Označivači stranica; Crte; Mješoviti brojevi; Bez brojeva; Rimski brojevi; Ostalo
fr: Style des chiffres: Chiffres arabes; Chiffres décoratifs; Chiffres numériques; Points; Marqueurs d’index; Lignes; Chiffres mixtes; Pas de chiffres; Chiffres romains; Autre
sk-SK: Štýl číslic: Arabské číslice; Dekoratívne číslice; Digitálne číslice; Bodky; Indexové značky; Čiary; Zmiešané číslice; Žiadne číslice; Rímske číslice; Iné
sv: Sifferstil: Arabiska siffror; Dekorativa siffror; Digitala siffror; Prickar; Indexmarkörer; Linjer; Blandade siffror; Inga siffror; Romerska siffror; Övrigt
nl: Cijferstijl: Arabische cijfers; Decoratieve cijfers; Digitale cijfers; Punten; Indexmarkeringen; Streepjes; Gemengde getallen; Geen cijfers; Romeinse cijfers; Overig
da: Talstil: Arabiske tal; Dekorative tal; Digitale cifre; Prikker; Indeksmarkører; Linjer; Blandede tal; Ingen tal; Romertal; Andet
it: Stile numerico: Numeri arabi; Numeri decorativi; Cifre digitali; Pois; Indicatori di indice; Linee; Numeri misti; Nessun numero; numeri romani; Altro
vi: Kiểu chữ số: Chữ số Ả Rập; Chữ số kiểu trang trí; Chữ số điện tử; Chấm; Vạch chỉ giờ; Dòng; Số hỗn hợp; Không có chữ số; Chữ số La Mã; Khác
sl-SI: Slog številk: Arabske številke; Dekorativne številke; Digitalne številke; Pike; Indeksni označevalci; Linijski; Mešane številke; Brez številk; Rimske številke; Druga
de: Ziffernstil: Arabische Ziffern; Dekorative Ziffern; Digitale Ziffern; Punkte; Indexmarkierungen; Linien; Gemischte Zahlen; Keine Ziffern; Römische Ziffern; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Стил на цифрите: Арабски цифри; Декоративни цифри; Дигитални цифри; Точки; Индексни маркери; Линии; Смесени цифри; Без цифри; Римски цифри; Друго
ko: 숫자 표기 스타일: 아라비아 숫자; 장식형 숫자; 디지털 숫자; 도트; 인덱스 마커; 라인; 혼합형 숫자; 숫자 없음; 로마 숫자; 기타
pl: Typ numeryczny: Cyfry arabskie; Cyfry dekoracyjne; Cyfry cyfrowe; Kropki; Indeksy godzinowe; Linie; Cyfry mieszane; Bez cyfr; Cyfry rzymskie; Pozostałe
fi: Numerotyyli: Arabialaiset numerot; Koristeelliset numerot; Digitaaliset numerot; Pisteet; Indeksimerkit; Linjat; Sekalaiset numerot; Ei numeroita; Roomalaiset numerot; Muu
tr: Rakam stili: Arap rakamları; Dekoratif rakamlar; Dijital rakamlar; Noktalar; İndeks işaretleri; Çizgi; Karışık rakamlar; Rakam yok; Roma rakamları; Diğer
nb: Tallstil: Arabiske tall; Dekorative tall; Digitale sifre; Prikker; Indeksmarkører; Linjer; Blandede tall; Ingen tall; Romertall; Annet
ru: Стиль цифр: Арабские цифры; Декоративные цифры; Цифровые символы; Точки; Индексные метки; Штрихи; Смешанные цифры; Без цифр; Римские цифры; Другое
ja: 数字のスタイル: アラビア数字; 装飾数字; デジタル数字; 小数点; インデックスマーカー; 線; 混合数字; 数字なし; ローマ数字; その他
en: Numeral style: Arabic numerals; Decorative numerals; Digital digits; Dots; Index markers; Lines; Mixed numerals; No numerals; Roman numerals; Other
th: รูปแบบตัวเลข: ตัวเลขอารบิก; ตัวเลขลวดลาย; ตัวเลขดิจิทัล; ลายจุด; ขีดบอกตำแหน่ง; เส้น; ตัวเลขผสม; ไม่มีตัวเลข; ตัวเลขโรมัน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Stilul cifrelor: Cifre arabe; Cifre decorative; Cifre digitale; Puncte; Marcatori de index; Linii; Cifre mixte; Fără cifre; Cifre romane; Altele
zh-CN: 数字样式: 阿拉伯数字; 装饰性数字; 数码数字; 点状; 索引标记; 线状; 混合数字; 无数字; 罗马数字; 其他
lt-LT: Skaičių stilius: Arabiški skaitmenys; Dekoratyviniai skaitmenys; Skaitmeniniai skaitmenys; Taškeliai; Indekso žymekliai; Linijos; Mišrūs skaitmenys; Be skaitmenų; Romėniški skaitmenys; Kita
zh-TW: 數字樣式: 阿拉伯數字; 裝飾性數字; 數位; 點; 索引標記; 線; 混合數字; 無數字; 羅馬數字; 其他
el: Στυλ αριθμών: Αραβικοί αριθμοί; Διακοσμητικοί αριθμοί; Ψηφιακά νούμερα; Κουκκίδες; Δείκτες ευρετηρίου; Γραμμές; Μικτοί αριθμοί; Χωρίς αριθμούς; Ρωμαϊκοί αριθμοί; Άλλο
hu: Számstílus: Arab számok; Dekoratív számok; Digitális számjegyek; Pont; Indexjelölők; Vonal; Vegyes számok; Nincsenek számok; Római számok; Egyéb
cs: Styl číslic: Arabské číslice; Dekorativní číslice; Digitální číslice; Tečky; Indexové značky; Linky; Smíšené číslice; Bez číslic; Římské číslice; Jiné
pt-PT: Estilo dos numerais: Algarismos árabes; Algarismos decorativos; Dígitos digitais; Pontos; Marcadores de índice; Linhas; Algarismos mistos; Sem algarismos; Algarismos romanos; Outro
pt-BR: Estilo numérico: Algarismos arábicos; Numerais decorativos; Números digitais; Pontos; Marcadores de índice; Linhas; Numerais mistos; Sem numerais; Numerais romanos; Outro